Kentucky statutes. TITLE XIX Public Safety and Morals
CHAPTER 238 Charitable Gaming
238.535.
Licensing of charitable organizations conducting charitable gaming — Exemptions — Qualifications.

Any charitable organization conducting charitable gaming in the Commonwealth of Kentucky shall be licensed by the department. A charitable organization qualifying under subsection (12) of this section but not exceeding the limitations provided in this subsection shall be exempt from the licensure requirements when conducting the following charitable gaming activities:

Bingo in which the gross receipts do not exceed a total of twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per year;

A raffle or raffles for which the gross receipts do not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per year; and

A charity fundraising event or events that do not involve special limited charitable games and the gross gaming receipts for which do not exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000) per year.

However, at no time shall a charitable organization’s total limitations under this subsection exceed twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

Any charitable organization exempt from the process of applying for a license under subsection (1) of this section, shall notify the department in writing, on a simple form issued by the department, of its intent to engage in exempt charitable gaming and the address at which the gaming is to occur. Any charitable organization exempt from the process of applying for a license under subsection (1) of this section, shall comply with all other provisions of this chapter relating to the conduct of charitable gaming, except:

Payment of the fee imposed under the provisions of KRS

238.570

; and

The quarterly reporting requirements imposed under the provisions of KRS 238.550(7), unless the exempt charitable organization obtains a retroactive license pursuant to subsection (9) of this section.

Before January 31 of the year immediately following the year of exemption, a charitable organization exempt from licensure under the provisions of subsection (1) of this section shall file a financial report with the department, on a form issued by the department, that contains the following information:

The type of gaming activity in which it engaged during that year;

The total gross receipts derived from gaming;

The amount of charitable gaming expenses paid;

The amount of net receipts derived; and

The disposition of those net receipts.

An exemption that has been granted to a charitable organization for the preceding calendar year shall be automatically renewed on January 1 of the following year.

If upon receipt of the financial report the department determines that the information appearing on the financial report renders the charitable organization ineligible to possess an exemption, the department shall notify the charitable organization that its exemption is rescinded. The organization may request an appeal of this rescission pursuant to KRS

238.565

.

If the annual financial report is not received by January 31, the exemption is automatically rescinded unless an extension of no more than thirty (30) days is granted by the department. The organization may request an appeal of this rescission pursuant to KRS

238.565

.

If an exemption is revoked because an organization has exceeded the limit imposed in subsection (1) of this section, the organization shall apply for a retroactive license in accordance with subsection (7) of this section.

If an organization exceeds the limit imposed by any subsection of this section it shall:

Report the amount to the department; and

Apply for a retroactive charitable gaming license.

Upon receipt of a report and application for a retroactive charitable gaming license, the department shall investigate to determine if the organization is otherwise qualified to hold the license.

If the department determines that the applicant is qualified, it shall issue a charitable gaming license retroactive to the date on which the exemption limit was exceeded. The retroactive charitable gaming license shall be issued in the same manner as regular charitable gaming licenses.

If the department determines that the applicant is not qualified it shall deny the license and take enforcement action, if appropriate.

Once a retroactive or regular gaming license is issued to an organization, that organization shall not be eligible for exempt status in the future and shall maintain a charitable gaming license if it intends to continue charitable gaming activities, unless the charitable organization has not exceeded the exemption limitations of subsection (1) of this section for a period of two (2) years prior to its exemption request.

In order to qualify for licensure, a charitable organization shall:

Possess a tax exempt status under 26

U.S.C. secs. 501(c)(3)

, 501(c)(4), 501(c)(8), 501(c)(10), or 501(c)(19), or be covered under a group ruling issued by the Internal Revenue Service under authority of those sections; or

Be organized within the Commonwealth of Kentucky as a common school as defined in KRS

158.030

, as an institution of higher education as defined in KRS

164A.305

, or as a state college or university as provided for in KRS

164.290

;

Have been established and continuously operating within the Commonwealth of Kentucky for charitable purposes, other than the conduct of charitable gaming, for a period of three (3) years prior to application for licensure. For purposes of this paragraph, an applicant shall demonstrate establishment and continuous operation in Kentucky by its conduct of charitable activities from an office physically located within Kentucky both during the three (3) years immediately preceding its application for licensure and at all times during which it possesses a charitable gaming license. However, a charitable organization that operates for charitable purposes in more than ten (10) states and whose principal place of business is physically located in a state other than Kentucky may satisfy the requirements of this paragraph if it can document that it has:

Been actively engaged in charitable activities and has made reasonable progress, as defined in subparagraph 3. of this paragraph, in the conduct of charitable activities or the expenditure of funds within Kentucky for a period of three (3) years prior to application for licensure; and

Operated for charitable purposes from an office or place of business in the Kentucky county where it proposes to conduct charitable gaming for at least one (1) year prior to application for licensure, in accordance with subparagraph 4. of this paragraph and paragraph (c) of this subsection;

Have been actively engaged in charitable activities during the three (3) years immediately prior to application for licensure and be able to demonstrate, to the satisfaction of the department, reasonable progress in accomplishing its charitable purposes during this period. As used in this paragraph, “reasonable progress in accomplishing its charitable purposes” means the regular and uninterrupted conduct of activities within the Commonwealth or the expenditure of funds within the Commonwealth to accomplish relief of poverty, advancement of education, protection of health, relief from disease, relief from suffering or distress, protection of the environment, conservation of wildlife, advancement of civic, governmental, or municipal purposes, or advancement of those purposes delineated in KRS 238.505(3). In order to demonstrate reasonable progress in accomplishing its charitable purposes when applying to renew an existing license, a licensed charitable organization shall additionally provide to the department a detailed accounting regarding its expenditure of charitable gaming net receipts for the purposes described in this paragraph; and

Have maintained an office or place of business, other than for the conduct of charitable gaming, for at least one (1) year in the county in which charitable gaming is to be conducted. The office or place of business shall be a separate and distinct address and location from that of any other licensee of the Department of Charitable Gaming; except that up to three (3) licensed charitable organizations may have the same address if they legitimately share office space.

A charitable organization that has established and maintained an office or place of business in the county for a period of at least one (1) year may hold a raffle drawing or a charity fundraising event, including special limited charity fundraising events, in a Kentucky county other than that in which the organization’s office or place of business is located.

For raffles, the organization shall notify the Department of Charitable Gaming in writing of the organization’s intent to change the drawing’s location at least thirty (30) days before the drawing takes place. This written notification:

May be transmitted in any commercially reasonable means, authorized by the department, including facsimile and electronic mail; and

Shall set out the place and the county in which the drawing will take place.

Approval by the department shall be received prior to the conduct of the raffle drawing at the new location.

Any charitable organization that was registered with the county clerk to conduct charitable gaming in a county on or before March 31, 1992, shall satisfy the requirement contained in paragraph (a)4. of this subsection if it maintained a place of business or operation, other than for the conduct of charitable gaming, for one (1) year prior to application in a Kentucky county adjoining the county in which they were registered.

In applying for a license, the information to be submitted shall include but not be limited to the following:

The name and address of the charitable organization;

The date of the charitable organization’s establishment in the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the date of establishment in the county or counties in which charitable gaming is to be conducted;

A statement of the charitable purpose or purposes for which the organization was organized. If the charitable organization is incorporated, a copy of the articles of incorporation shall satisfy this requirement;

A statement explaining the organizational structure and management of the organization. For incorporated entities, a copy of the organizations’ bylaws shall satisfy this requirement;

A detailed accounting of the charitable activities in which the charitable organization has been engaged for the three (3) years preceding application for licensure;

The names, addresses, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of all officers of the organization;

The names, addresses, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of all employees and members of the charitable organization who will be involved in the management and supervision of charitable gaming. No fewer than two (2) employees or members of the charitable organization who are involved in the management and supervision of charitable gaming, along with the chief executive officer or the director of the applicant organization, shall be designated as chairpersons;

The address of the location at which charitable gaming will be conducted and the name and address of the owner of the property, if it is owned by a person other than the charitable organization;

A copy of the letter or other legal document issued by the Internal Revenue Service to grant tax-exempt status;

A statement signed by the presiding or other responsible officer of the charitable organization attesting that the information submitted in the application is true and correct and that the organization agrees to comply with all applicable laws and administrative regulations regarding charitable gaming;

An agreement that the charitable organization’s records may be released by the Federal Internal Revenue Service to the department; and

Any other information the department deems appropriate.

An organization or a group of individuals that does not meet the licensing requirements of subsection (12) of this section may hold a raffle if:

The gross receipts do not exceed five hundred dollars ($500);

All proceeds from the raffle are distributed to a charitable organization; and

The organization or group of individuals holds no more than three (3) raffles each year;

and shall be exempt from complying with the notification, application, and reporting requirements of subsections (2) and (13) of this section.

An organization or a group of individuals that does not meet the licensing requirements of subsection (12) of this section may hold a raffle if:

The organization holds a special event raffle license issued by the department and complies with the regulatory requirements in this chapter, including but not limited to the quarterly reporting requirements of KRS 238.550(7), the retention requirements of KRS

238.536

, and payment of the fee imposed by KRS

238.570

;

The organization possesses a tax-exempt status under 26

U.S.C. sec. 501(c)(7)

;

The organization holds no more than twelve (12) raffles per year;

Each raffle complies with the department’s raffle standards in KRS

238.545

and administrative regulations promulgated thereunder and is approved by the department in writing prior to the sale of the first raffle ticket;

The gross receipts of each raffle do not exceed five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000); and

One hundred percent (100%) of the net receipts of each raffle shall be distributed to a charitable organization licensed by the department pursuant to subsection (12) of this section to conduct charitable gaming as follows:

All distributed net receipts shall be maintained by the recipient licensed charitable organization in a separate account to be designated as the “raffle recipient account”;

All distributed net receipts shall be expended by the recipient licensed charitable organization to further the charitable purpose of the recipient licensed charitable organization as required by KRS 238.550(4); and

All distributed net receipts, and the expenditure thereof, shall be reported to the department and be subject to the department’s auditing and investigative authority consistent with the provisions of this chapter.

An applicant qualifying under paragraph (b) of this subsection shall submit an application for a special event raffle license, and the information to be submitted shall include but not be limited to the following:

The name and address of the organization;

The date of the organization’s establishment in the Commonwealth of Kentucky and the date of the organization’s establishment in the county or counties in which charitable gaming is to be conducted;

A statement of the purpose or purposes for which the organization was organized and identification of the licensed charitable organization to which the applicant will distribute its net receipts. If the organization is incorporated, a copy of the articles of incorporation shall satisfy this requirement;

A statement explaining the organizational structure and management of the organization. For incorporated entities, a copy of the organization’s bylaws shall satisfy this requirement;

The names, addresses, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of all officers of the organization;

The names, addresses, dates of birth, and Social Security numbers of all employees and members of the organization who will be involved in the management and supervision of charitable gaming. No fewer than two (2) employees or members of the organization who are involved in the management and supervision of charitable gaming, along with the chief executive officer or the director of the applicant organization, shall be designated as chairpersons;

The address of the location at which charitable gaming will be conducted and the name and address of the owner of the property, if it is owned by a person other than the organization;

A copy of the letter or other legal document issued by the Internal Revenue Service to grant tax-exempt status;

A statement signed by the presiding or other responsible officer of the organization attesting that the information submitted in the application is true and correct and that the organization agrees to comply with all applicable laws and administrative regulations regarding charitable gaming;

An agreement that the organization’s records may be released by the federal Internal Revenue Service to the department; and

Any other information as determined by the department through the promulgation of administrative regulations.

The department may issue a license for a specified period of time, based on the type of charitable gaming involved and the desired duration of the activity.

The department shall charge a fee for each license issued and renewed, not to exceed three hundred dollars ($300). Specific fees to be charged shall be prescribed in a graduated scale promulgated by administrative regulations and based on type of license, type of charitable gaming, actual or projected gross receipts, or other applicable factors, or combination of factors.

A licensed charitable organization may place its charitable gaming license in escrow if:

The licensee notifies the department in writing that it desires to place its license in escrow; and

The license is in good standing and the department has not initiated disciplinary action against the licensee.

During the escrow period, the licensee shall not engage in charitable gaming, and the escrow period shall not be included in calculating the licensee’s retention rate under KRS

238.536

.

A charitable organization may apply for reinstatement of its active license and the license shall be reinstated provided:

The charitable organization continues to qualify for licensure;

The charitable organization has not engaged in charitable gaming during the escrow period; and

The charitable organization pays a reinstatement fee established by the department.

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 8, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 7, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 6, effective April 1, 1998; 1998, ch. 434, § 4, effective July 15, 1998; 2000, ch. 165, § 1, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 374, § 8, effective July 14, 2000; 2002, ch. 346, § 238, effective July 15, 2002; 2007, ch. 120, § 7, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 540, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 45, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2015 ch. 59, § 2, effective June 24, 2015; 2018 ch. 84, § 1, effective January 1, 2019.

238.536.
Amount and use of net receipts retained by charitable organization — Penalties imposed upon charitable organization failing to retain certain percentage of adjusted gross receipts — Submission of financial plan — Petition for reconsideration.

The net receipts from charitable gaming retained by a charitable organization for the previous calendar year, provided the charitable organization was licensed at the start of the calendar year, shall be equal to or greater than forty percent (40%) of the adjusted gross receipts of the charitable organization for the same period. A licensed charitable organization shall expend net receipts exclusively for purposes consistent with the charitable, religious, educational, literary, civic, fraternal, or patriotic functions or objectives for which the licensed charitable organization received and maintains federal tax-exempt status, or consistent with its status as a common school, an institution of higher education, or a state college or university. No net receipts shall inure to the benefits or financial gain of an individual. Any charitable organization which permits its license to expire or otherwise lapse shall still be subject to the retention requirement. The following fees and taxes shall be excluded from the calculation of the percentage retained, retroactive to calculations made for calendar year 1999:

All fees paid to the department during the calendar year;

Any sales or use taxes levied under KRS Chapter 139 on charitable gaming supplies and equipment that are paid by a licensed charitable organization during the calendar year; and

Any federal excise taxes levied under 26

U.S.C. secs. 4401

and 4411 and paid by a licensed charitable organization during the calendar year.

The following actions shall be imposed on a licensed charitable organization that fails to retain the requisite percentage of adjusted gross receipts required in subsection (1) of this section. The calculation of percentages shall be rounded to the nearest tenth of a percent:

If the percentage retained is between thirty-five percent (35%) and thirty-nine and nine-tenths percent (39.9%), the licensee shall be placed on probation for a period of six (6) months and shall be required to submit to the department an acceptable financial plan detailing corrective actions to be taken by the licensee to achieve the forty percent (40%) threshold by the end of the calendar year in which the probation is imposed;

If the percentage retained is between thirty percent (30%) and thirty-four and nine-tenths percent (34.9%), the licensee shall be placed on probation for a period of one (1) year and shall be required to submit to the department a financial plan as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection. The department shall conduct a six (6) month review of the charitable gaming activities of a licensee placed on probation pursuant to this subsection to evaluate the licensee’s compliance with its financial plan;

If the percentage retained falls between twenty-nine and nine-tenths percent (29.9%) and twenty-five percent (25%), the licensee shall be placed on probation for a period of one (1) year, shall submit to the department an acceptable financial plan as described in paragraph (a) of this subsection, and shall participate in a mandatory training program designed by the department. The department shall conduct a quarterly review of the licensee’s activities to evaluate the licensee’s compliance with its financial plan and its progress toward achievement of the forty percent (40%) threshold during the probationary period;

If the percentage falls below twenty-five percent (25%) or if the licensee fails to attain the forty percent (40%) threshold for a second consecutive calendar year, the licensee shall have its license suspended for a period of one (1) year; and

For purposes of paragraphs (a), (b), (c), and (d) of this subsection, periods of probation and suspension shall commence, unless appealed, from the date the department notifies the licensee of its failure to satisfy the retention requirement for the previous calendar year. If a probation or suspension is appealed, the action shall commence on the date final adjudication of the matter is complete.

Any licensee that has had its license suspended under the provisions of subsection (2)(d) of this section shall be required to submit to the department an acceptable financial plan as described in subsection (2)(a) of this section, upon applying for reinstatement of its license. As a condition of reinstatement, the licensee shall be on probation for a period of one (1) year and shall be subject to quarterly review by the department in accordance with subsection (2)(c) of this section.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 232, § 7, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 9, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 541, effective July 15, 2010; 2021 ch. 200, § 2, effective April 8, 2021.

238.540.
Restrictions on location for charitable gaming — Display of license — Conduct and management — Prohibited donated prizes — Advertising.

Charitable gaming shall be conducted by a licensed charitable organization at the location, date, and time which shall be stated on the license. The licensee shall request a change in the date, time, or location of a charitable gaming event by mail, electronic mail, or facsimile transmission, and shall submit a lease and an original signature of an officer. The department shall process this request and issue or deny a license within ten (10) days.

All premises or facilities on which or in which charitable gaming is conducted shall meet all applicable federal, state, and local code requirements relating to life, safety, and health.

A license to conduct charitable gaming shall be prominently displayed on or in the premises where charitable gaming is conducted, in a conspicuous location that is readily accessible to gaming patrons as well as employees of the department, law enforcement officials, and other interested officials.

At least one (1) chairperson who is listed on the application for licensure shall be at each charitable gaming activity conducted by the charitable organization and shall be responsible for the administration and conduct of the charitable gaming activity. No person shall serve as chairperson for more than one (1) charitable organization. The chairperson shall be readily identifiable as the chairperson and shall be present on the premises continuously during the charitable gaming activity. Charitable gaming shall be conducted and administered solely by officers, members, and bona fide employees of the licensed charitable organization. Volunteer personnel, who may or may not be members of the licensed charitable organization, may be utilized if each volunteer is readily identifiable as a volunteer. No person engaged in the conduct and administration of charitable gaming shall receive any compensation for services related to the charitable gaming activities, including tipping. No net receipts derived from charitable gaming shall inure to the private benefit or financial gain of any individual. Any effort or attempt to disguise any other type of compensation or private inurement shall be considered an unauthorized diversion of funds and shall be actionable under KRS

238.995

.

No licensed charitable organization shall contract with, or otherwise utilize the services of, any management company, service company, or consultant in managing or conducting any aspect of charitable gaming.

A licensed charitable organization shall not purchase or lease charitable gaming supplies and equipment from any person not licensed as a distributor in the Commonwealth of Kentucky.

A licensed charitable organization shall not accept any merchandise prizes donated by any owner, officer, employee, or contractee of a licensed manufacturer, distributor, charitable gaming facility, or any of their affiliates, or any member of their immediate families.

Each organization’s gaming supplies shall be maintained in a location separate from another organization’s gaming supplies.

This location shall also be locked and access shall be controlled.

Unless otherwise directed by the department, an organization’s supplies and equipment remain the property of the organization regardless of where they are stored and must be accessible to the organization at all reasonable times upon request.

Any advertisement of charitable gaming, regardless of the medium used, shall contain the name of the charitable organization conducting the charitable gaming and its license number. An advertisement for a bingo session or sessions shall not advertise a bingo prize in excess of the limitation of five thousand dollars ($5,000) per twenty-four (24) hour period set forth in KRS 238.545(1).

HISTORY:

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 9, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 8, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 8, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 165, § 2, effective July 14, 2000; 2000, ch. 374, § 10, effective July 14, 2000; 2007, ch. 120, § 8, effective June 26, 2007; 2010, ch. 24, § 542, effective July 15, 2010; 2015 ch. 45, § 4, effective June 24, 2015; 2015 ch. 59, § 3, effective June 24, 2015.

Legislative Research Commission Notes.

(6/24/2015). This statute was amended by 2015 Ky. Acts chs. 45 and 59, which do not appear to be in conflict and have been codified together.

238.545.
Restrictions on frequency, prizes, and participants for various types of charitable gaming — Limitations on charitable organizations that conduct charity fundraising events.

A licensed charitable organization shall be limited by the following:

In the conduct of bingo, to one (1) session per day, two (2) sessions per week, for a period not to exceed five (5) consecutive hours in any day and not to exceed ten (10) total hours per week:

No licensed charitable organization shall conduct bingo at more than one (1) location during the same twenty-four (24) hour period;

No licensed charitable organization shall award prizes for bingo that exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) in fair market value per twenty-four (24) hour period, including the value of door prizes; and

No person under the age of eighteen (18) shall be permitted to purchase bingo supplies or play bingo unless he or she is playing for noncash prizes and is accompanied by a parent or legal guardian and only if the value of any noncash prize awarded does not exceed ten dollars ($10);

A licensed charitable organization may provide card-minding devices for use by players of bingo games.

If a licensed charitable organization offers card-minding devices for use by players, the devices shall be capable of being used in conjunction with bingo cards or paper sheets at all times.

The department shall have broad authority to define and regulate the use of card-minding devices and shall promulgate an administrative regulation concerning use and control of them;

Charity game tickets shall be sold only at the address of the location designated on the license to conduct charitable gaming;

Charity game tickets may be sold, with prior approval of the department:

At any authorized special charity fundraising event conducted by a licensed charitable organization at any off-site location; or

By a licensed charitable organization possessing a special limited charitable gaming license at any off-site location; and

An automated charity game ticket dispenser may be utilized by a licensed charitable organization, with the prior approval of the department, only at the address of the location designated on the license to conduct charitable gaming. The department shall promulgate administrative regulations regulating the use and control of approved automated charity game ticket dispensers.

No prize for an individual charity game ticket shall exceed five hundred ninety-nine dollars ($599) in value, not including the value of cumulative or carryover prizes awarded in seal card games.

Cumulative or carryover prizes in seal card games shall not exceed two thousand four hundred dollars ($2,400).

Information concerning rules of the particular game and prizes that are to be awarded in excess of fifty dollars ($50) in each separate package or series of packages with the same serial number and all rules governing the handling of cumulative or carryover prizes in seal card games shall be posted prominently in an area where charity game tickets are sold. A legible poster that lists prizes to be awarded, and on which prizes actually awarded are posted at the completion of the sale of each separate package shall satisfy this requirement.

Any unclaimed money or prize shall return to the charitable organization.

No paper charity game ticket shall be sold in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that does not conform to the standards for opacity, randomization, minimum information, winner protection, color, and cutting established by the department.

No electronic pulltab device representation of a charity game ticket shall be sold in the Commonwealth of Kentucky that does not conform to the construction standards set forth in an administrative regulation promulgated by the department. Electronic pulltab devices shall only be used for charitable gaming.

No person under the age of eighteen (18) shall be permitted to purchase, or open in any manner, a charity game ticket.

Tickets for a raffle shall be sold separately, and each ticket shall constitute a separate and equal chance to win.

All raffle tickets shall be sold for the price stated on the ticket, and no person shall be required to purchase more than one (1) ticket or to pay for anything other than a ticket to enter a raffle.

Raffle tickets and tickets for charity fundraising raffle games approved by the department which are offered exclusively at charity fundraising events and special limited charity fundraising events are not required to be sold separately and may be sold at discounted package rates.

Raffle tickets shall have a unique identifier on each ticket.

Winners shall be drawn at random at a date, time, and place announced in advance or printed on the ticket.

All prizes for a raffle shall be identified in advance of the drawing and all prizes identified shall be awarded.

With respect to charity fundraising events, a licensed charitable organization shall be limited as follows:

No licensed charitable organization shall conduct a charity fundraising event or a special limited charity fundraising event unless they have a license for the respective event issued by the department;

No special license shall be required for any wheel game, such as a cake wheel, that awards only noncash prizes the value of which does not exceed one hundred dollars ($100);

The department may grant approval for a licensed charitable organization to play bingo games at a charity fundraising event. Cash prizes for bingo games played during a charity fundraising event may not exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) for the entire event. No person under the age of eighteen (18) shall be permitted to play bingo at a charity fundraising event unless accompanied by a parent or legal guardian;

The department may grant approval for a licensed charitable organization to play special limited charitable games at a charity fundraising event authorized under this section. The department shall not grant approval for the playing of special limited charitable games under the provisions of a charity fundraising event license unless the proposed event meets the definition of a charity fundraising event held for community, social, or entertainment purposes apart from charitable gaming in accordance with KRS 238.505(8);

Except for state, county, city fairs, and special limited charity fundraising events, a charity fundraising event license issued under this section shall not exceed seventy-two (72) consecutive hours. A licensed charitable organization shall not be eligible for more than eight (8) total charity fundraising event licenses per year, including two (2) special limited charity fundraising event licenses. No person under eighteen (18) years of age shall be allowed to play or conduct any special limited charitable game. The department shall have broad authority to regulate the conduct of special limited charity fundraising events in accordance with the provisions of KRS

238.547

; and

Charity fundraising events may be held:

On or in the premises of a licensed charitable organization;

In a licensed charitable gaming facility, subject to restrictions contained in KRS 238.555(7); or

At an unlicensed facility which shall be subject to the requirements stipulated in KRS 238.555(3), and subject to the restrictions contained in KRS

238.547

(2).

Presentation of false, fraudulent, or altered identification by a minor shall be an affirmative defense in any disciplinary action or prosecution that may result from a violation of age restrictions contained in this section, if the appearance and character of the minor were such that his or her age could not be reasonably ascertained by other means.

History.

Enact. Acts 1994, ch. 66, § 10, effective March 16, 1994; 1996, ch. 331, § 9, effective April 10, 1996; 1998, ch. 232, § 9, effective April 1, 1998; 2000, ch. 374, § 11, effective July 14, 2000; 2010, ch. 24, § 543, effective July 15, 2010; 2019 ch. 62, § 1, effective June 27, 2019.

238.547.
Special limited charitable fundraising event licenses — Limitation — Times — Locations — Restrictions on wagering, stakes, and prizes.

A licensed charitable organization shall be limited to two (2) special limited charity fundraising event licenses per year, and a special limited charity fundraising event shall be limited to one (1) session not to exceed six (6) hours. A special limited charity fundraising event shall be conducted only between the hours of 12 noon and 1 a.m.

A special limited charity fundraising event may be held:

On or in the premises of a licensed charitable organization;

In a licensed charitable gaming facility, subject to restrictions contained in KRS 238.555(7); or

At an unlicensed facility under the following conditions:

An unlicensed facility shall host no more than one (1) special limited charity fundraising event per year;

The facility shall be closed to the general public during the conduct of a special limited charity fundraising event or the event shall be held in a separate room or area not accessible to the general public;

Equipment used in the conduct of a special limited charity fundraising event shall be removed from the premises within two (2) working days after the event; and

The unlicensed facility shall be subject to requirements stipulated in KRS 238.555(3).

No cash shall be used in playing special limited charity games at a special limited charity fundraising event. Games shall be played with chips, scrip, or imitation money which shall be purchased only through a central bank or cashier under the authority of the chairperson designated by the licensed charitable organization conducting the special limited charity fundraising event. No chips, scrip, or imitation money shall be sold at a gaming table or by a dealer.

Chips, scrip, or imitation money may be redeemed for cash or prizes. Prizes to be offered and their fair market values shall be displayed or listed in a conspicuous location within the gaming area. Prizes shall be redeemed directly or through an auction process within twenty-four (24) hours after the conclusion of the event.

History.

Enact. Acts 1998, ch. 232, § 10, effective April 1, 1998.